West Virginia, session 2025, HB2588.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 14. MISCELLANEOUS RULES. §17C-14-16. Use of emergency flashers when operating motor vehicle below the posted speed limit; penalty. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, a driver that is operating any motor vehicle 10 miles per hour below the posted speed limit on any public road shall display emergency flashers. (b) Any person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $25; upon a second conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $100; and upon a third or subsequent conviction, shall be fined not more than $200.